Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-317
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund Act is to authorize the commission to establish a funding mechanism which supplements federal universal service support mechanisms and ensures that all Nebraskans, without regard to their location, have comparable accessibility to telecommunications services at affordable prices.

Laws 1997, LB 686, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1402;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 195.